Massachusetts, session 194th, H3922.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, in the city of
Somerville, any person who performs real estate brokerage activities and is licensed or registered
pursuant to sections 87PP to 87DDD1/2, inclusive, of chapter 112 of the General Laws may
solely contract with a prospective tenant to find for rent residential property for a tenant and
present an offer to lease to the landlord or landlord’s agent and negotiate on behalf of the tenant
or may solely contract with a landlord or landlord’s agent to find a tenant for a property. Any fee
shall only be paid by the party, lessor or tenant who originally engaged and entered into a
contract with the licensed broker or salesperson.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1